Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2818
Writ; return by person detaining; signature and verification.

The return or statement shall be signed by the person making it, and it shall be sworn to by him, unless he is a public officer and makes the return in his official capacity.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 372, p. 808;

R.S.1913, § 9264;

C.S.1922, § 10293;

C.S.1929, § 29-2818;

R.S.1943, § 29-2818.